Hawaii statutes.
§841-4 Testimony under oath reduced to
writing. The testimony of all witnesses examined by any coroner or deputy
coroner pertaining to the death of any person wherein a coroner's investigation
is required, shall be taken under oath, reduced to writing by the coroner, or
deputy coroner or by some other person by the coroner's or deputy coroner's
direction, and subscribed to by witnesses. [L 1935, c 90, §4; RL 1945, §10904;
RL 1955, §260-4; HRS §715-4; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next